Illinois, session 104th, SB68.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Judicial Domestic Violence Training Act. 6    Section 5. Education and training program. 7    (a) The Judicial Education Division of the Administrative 8Office of the Illinois Courts shall develop and implement a 9domestic violence continuing education program for judges and 10relevant court personnel. The continuing education program 11shall: 12        (1) be provided by professionals with substantial 13    experience in assisting survivors of domestic violence; 14        (2) rely on evidence-based, peer-reviewed research by 15    recognized experts; and 16        (3) be designed to improve the ability of the courts 17    to recognize and respond to physical abuse, sexual abuse, 18    domestic violence, and trauma and to make appropriate 19    decisions that prioritize the safety and well-being of 20    victims and household members and are culturally sensitive 21    and appropriate for diverse communities.22    (b) The continuing education program described in this 23Section shall include, but is not limited to, information on   SB0068- 2 -LRB104 06321 JRC 16356 b1the following subjects: 2        (1) the nature, extent, and causes of domestic 3    violence; 4        (2) the lethality of domestic violence; 5        (3) physical abuse, emotional abuse, and coercive 6    control; 7        (4) implicit and explicit biases toward parties 8    involved in domestic violence; 9        (5) trauma and the short and long term impacts of 10    domestic violence on the victim and household members; 11        (6) behavioral patterns and relationship dynamics 12    within the cycle of violence; 13        (7) the increased vulnerability of victims who are 14    gay, lesbian, bisexual, transgender, low-income, minority 15    or immigrant; 16        (8) culturally responsive approaches to serving 17    victims and courtroom treatment of victims; 18        (9) procedures designed to promote the safety of the 19    victim and household members; 20        (10) resources available to victims and household 21    members; and 22        (11) civil rights and legal remedies available to 23    victims and household members.24    (c) The continuing education program described in this 25Section shall be required training for all judges every 2 26years and shall be held at every biennial Education Conference   SB0068- 3 -LRB104 06321 JRC 16356 b1and every New Judge Seminar.2    (d) Documentation showing completion of the class shall be 3submitted to and recorded by the Administrative Office of the 4Illinois Courts and shall be made available to the public upon 5request.